Illinois, session 104th, HB3847.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-1006.5 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1006.5)7    Sec. 5-1006.5. Special County Retailers' Occupation Tax 8For Public Safety, Public Facilities, Mental Health, Substance 9Abuse, or Transportation.10    (a) The county board of any county may impose a tax upon 11all persons engaged in the business of selling tangible 12personal property, other than personal property titled or 13registered with an agency of this State's government, at 14retail in the county on the gross receipts from the sales made 15in the course of business to provide revenue to be used 16exclusively for public safety, public facility, mental health, 17substance abuse, or transportation purposes in that county 18(except as otherwise provided in this Section), if a 19proposition for the tax has been submitted to the electors of 20that county and approved by a majority of those voting on the 21question. If imposed, this tax shall be imposed only in 22one-quarter percent increments. By resolution, the county 23board may order the proposition to be submitted at any   HB3847- 2 -LRB104 06344 RTM 16380 b1election. If the tax is imposed for transportation purposes 2for expenditures for public highways or as authorized under 3the Illinois Highway Code, the county board must publish 4notice of the existence of its long-range highway 5transportation plan as required or described in Section 5-301 6of the Illinois Highway Code and must make the plan publicly 7available prior to approval of the ordinance or resolution 8imposing the tax. If the tax is imposed for transportation 9purposes for expenditures for passenger rail transportation, 10the county board must publish notice of the existence of its 11long-range passenger rail transportation plan and must make 12the plan publicly available prior to approval of the ordinance 13or resolution imposing the tax. 14    If a tax is imposed for public facilities purposes, then 15the name of the project may be included in the proposition at 16the discretion of the county board as determined in the 17enabling resolution. For example, the "XXX Nursing Home" or 18the "YYY Museum". 19    The county clerk shall certify the question to the proper 20election authority, who shall submit the proposition at an 21election in accordance with the general election law.22        (1) The proposition for public safety purposes shall 23    be in substantially the following form:24        "To pay for public safety purposes, shall (name of 25    county) be authorized to impose an increase on its share 26    of local sales taxes by (insert rate)?"  HB3847- 3 -LRB104 06344 RTM 16380 b1        As additional information on the ballot below the 2    question shall appear the following:3        "This would mean that a consumer would pay an 4    additional (insert amount) in sales tax for every $100 of 5    tangible personal property bought at retail." 6        The county board may also opt to establish a sunset 7    provision at which time the additional sales tax would 8    cease being collected, if not terminated earlier by a vote 9    of the county board. If the county board votes to include a 10    sunset provision, the proposition for public safety 11    purposes shall be in substantially the following form:12        "To pay for public safety purposes, shall (name of 13    county) be authorized to impose an increase on its share 14    of local sales taxes by (insert rate) for a period not to 15    exceed (insert number of years)?"16        As additional information on the ballot below the 17    question shall appear the following:18        "This would mean that a consumer would pay an 19    additional (insert amount) in sales tax for every $100 of 20    tangible personal property bought at retail. If imposed, 21    the additional tax would cease being collected at the end 22    of (insert number of years), if not terminated earlier by 23    a vote of the county board." 24        For the purposes of the paragraph, "public safety 25    purposes" means crime prevention, detention, fire 26    fighting, police, medical, ambulance, or other emergency   HB3847- 4 -LRB104 06344 RTM 16380 b1    services.2        Votes shall be recorded as "Yes" or "No".3        Beginning on the January 1 or July 1, whichever is 4    first, that occurs not less than 30 days after May 31, 2015 5    (the effective date of Public Act 99-4), Adams County may 6    impose a public safety retailers' occupation tax and 7    service occupation tax at the rate of 0.25%, as provided 8    in the referendum approved by the voters on April 7, 2015, 9    notwithstanding the omission of the additional information 10    that is otherwise required to be printed on the ballot 11    below the question pursuant to this item (1). 12        (2) The proposition for transportation purposes shall 13    be in substantially the following form:14        "To pay for improvements to roads and other 15    transportation purposes, shall (name of county) be 16    authorized to impose an increase on its share of local 17    sales taxes by (insert rate)?"18        As additional information on the ballot below the 19    question shall appear the following:20        "This would mean that a consumer would pay an 21    additional (insert amount) in sales tax for every $100 of 22    tangible personal property bought at retail." 23        The county board may also opt to establish a sunset 24    provision at which time the additional sales tax would 25    cease being collected, if not terminated earlier by a vote 26    of the county board. If the county board votes to include a   HB3847- 5 -LRB104 06344 RTM 16380 b1    sunset provision, the proposition for transportation 2    purposes shall be in substantially the following form:3        "To pay for road improvements and other transportation 4    purposes, shall (name of county) be authorized to impose 5    an increase on its share of local sales taxes by (insert 6    rate) for a period not to exceed (insert number of 7    years)?"8        As additional information on the ballot below the 9    question shall appear the following:10        "This would mean that a consumer would pay an 11    additional (insert amount) in sales tax for every $100 of 12    tangible personal property bought at retail. If imposed, 13    the additional tax would cease being collected at the end 14    of (insert number of years), if not terminated earlier by 15    a vote of the county board." 16        For the purposes of this paragraph, transportation 17    purposes means construction, maintenance, operation, and 18    improvement of public highways, any other purpose for 19    which a county may expend funds under the Illinois Highway 20    Code, and passenger rail transportation.21        The votes shall be recorded as "Yes" or "No".22        (3) The proposition for public facilities purposes 23    shall be in substantially the following form: 24        "To pay for public facilities purposes, shall (name of 25    county) be authorized to impose an increase on its share 26    of local sales taxes by (insert rate)?"   HB3847- 6 -LRB104 06344 RTM 16380 b1        As additional information on the ballot below the 2    question shall appear the following: 3        "This would mean that a consumer would pay an 4    additional (insert amount) in sales tax for every $100 of 5    tangible personal property bought at retail." 6        The county board may also opt to establish a sunset 7    provision at which time the additional sales tax would 8    cease being collected, if not terminated earlier by a vote 9    of the county board. If the county board votes to include a 10    sunset provision, the proposition for public facilities 11    purposes shall be in substantially the following form: 12        "To pay for public facilities purposes, shall (name of 13    county) be authorized to impose an increase on its share 14    of local sales taxes by (insert rate) for a period not to 15    exceed (insert number of years)?" 16        As additional information on the ballot below the 17    question shall appear the following: 18        "This would mean that a consumer would pay an 19    additional (insert amount) in sales tax for every $100 of 20    tangible personal property bought at retail. If imposed, 21    the additional tax would cease being collected at the end 22    of (insert number of years), if not terminated earlier by 23    a vote of the county board." 24        For purposes of this Section, "public facilities 25    purposes" means the acquisition, development, 26    construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation,   HB3847- 7 -LRB104 06344 RTM 16380 b1    improvement, financing, architectural planning, and 2    installation of capital facilities consisting of 3    buildings, structures, and durable equipment and for the 4    acquisition and improvement of real property and interest 5    in real property required, or expected to be required, in 6    connection with the public facilities, for use by the 7    county for the furnishing of governmental services to its 8    citizens, including, but not limited to, museums and 9    nursing homes. 10        The votes shall be recorded as "Yes" or "No". 11        (4) The proposition for mental health purposes shall 12    be in substantially the following form:13        "To pay for mental health purposes, shall (name of 14    county) be authorized to impose an increase on its share 15    of local sales taxes by (insert rate)?"16        As additional information on the ballot below the 17    question shall appear the following:18        "This would mean that a consumer would pay an 19    additional (insert amount) in sales tax for every $100 of 20    tangible personal property bought at retail."21        The county board may also opt to establish a sunset 22    provision at which time the additional sales tax would 23    cease being collected, if not terminated earlier by a vote 24    of the county board. If the county board votes to include a 25    sunset provision, the proposition for public facilities 26    purposes shall be in substantially the following form:  HB3847- 8 -LRB104 06344 RTM 16380 b1        "To pay for mental health purposes, shall (name of 2    county) be authorized to impose an increase on its share 3    of local sales taxes by (insert rate) for a period not to 4    exceed (insert number of years)?"5        As additional information on the ballot below the 6    question shall appear the following:7        "This would mean that a consumer would pay an 8    additional (insert amount) in sales tax for every $100 of 9    tangible personal property bought at retail. If imposed, 10    the additional tax would cease being collected at the end 11    of (insert number of years), if not terminated earlier by 12    a vote of the county board."13        The votes shall be recorded as "Yes" or "No". 14        (5) The proposition for substance abuse purposes shall 15    be in substantially the following form:16        "To pay for substance abuse purposes, shall (name of 17    county) be authorized to impose an increase on its share 18    of local sales taxes by (insert rate)?"19        As additional information on the ballot below the 20    question shall appear the following:21        "This would mean that a consumer would pay an 22    additional (insert amount) in sales tax for every $100 of 23    tangible personal property bought at retail."24        The county board may also opt to establish a sunset 25    provision at which time the additional sales tax would 26    cease being collected, if not terminated earlier by a vote   HB3847- 9 -LRB104 06344 RTM 16380 b1    of the county board. If the county board votes to include a 2    sunset provision, the proposition for public facilities 3    purposes shall be in substantially the following form:4        "To pay for substance abuse purposes, shall (name of 5    county) be authorized to impose an increase on its share 6    of local sales taxes by (insert rate) for a period not to 7    exceed (insert number of years)?"8        As additional information on the ballot below the 9    question shall appear the following:10        "This would mean that a consumer would pay an 11    additional (insert amount) in sales tax for every $100 of 12    tangible personal property bought at retail. If imposed, 13    the additional tax would cease being collected at the end 14    of (insert number of years), if not terminated earlier by 15    a vote of the county board."16        The votes shall be recorded as "Yes" or "No". 17    If a majority of the electors voting on the proposition 18vote in favor of it, the county may impose the tax. A county 19may not submit more than one proposition authorized by this 20Section to the electors at any one time.21    This additional tax may not be imposed on tangible 22personal property taxed at the 1% rate under the Retailers' 23Occupation Tax Act (or at the 0% rate imposed under this 24amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly). Beginning 25December 1, 2019 and through December 31, 2020, this tax is not 26imposed on sales of aviation fuel unless the tax revenue is   HB3847- 10 -LRB104 06344 RTM 16380 b1expended for airport-related purposes. If the county does not 2have an airport-related purpose to which it dedicates aviation 3fuel tax revenue, then aviation fuel is excluded from the tax. 4The county must comply with the certification requirements for 5airport-related purposes under Section 2-22 of the Retailers' 6Occupation Tax Act. For purposes of this Section, 7"airport-related purposes" has the meaning ascribed in Section 86z-20.2 of the State Finance Act. Beginning January 1, 2021, 9this tax is not imposed on sales of aviation fuel for so long 10as the revenue use requirements of 49 U.S.C. 47107(b) and 49 11U.S.C. 47133 are binding on the county. The tax imposed by a 12county under this Section and all civil penalties that may be 13assessed as an incident of the tax shall be collected and 14enforced by the Illinois Department of Revenue and deposited 15into a special fund created for that purpose. The certificate 16of registration that is issued by the Department to a retailer 17under the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act shall permit the 18retailer to engage in a business that is taxable without 19registering separately with the Department under an ordinance 20or resolution under this Section. The Department has full 21power to administer and enforce this Section, to collect all 22taxes and penalties due under this Section, to dispose of 23taxes and penalties so collected in the manner provided in 24this Section, and to determine all rights to credit memoranda 25arising on account of the erroneous payment of a tax or penalty 26under this Section. In the administration of and compliance   HB3847- 11 -LRB104 06344 RTM 16380 b1with this Section, the Department and persons who are subject 2to this Section shall (i) have the same rights, remedies, 3privileges, immunities, powers, and duties, (ii) be subject to 4the same conditions, restrictions, limitations, penalties, and 5definitions of terms, and (iii) employ the same modes of 6procedure as are prescribed in Sections 1, 1a, 1a-1, 1d, 1e, 71f, 1i, 1j, 1k, 1m, 1n, 2 through 2-70 (in respect to all 8provisions contained in those Sections other than the State 9rate of tax), 2a, 2b, 2c, 3 (except provisions relating to 10transaction returns and quarter monthly payments, and except 11that the retailer's discount is not allowed for taxes paid on 12aviation fuel that are deposited into the Local Government 13Aviation Trust Fund), 4, 5, 5a, 5b, 5c, 5d, 5e, 5f, 5g, 5h, 5i, 145j, 5k, 5l, 6, 6a, 6b, 6c, 6d, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 11a, 12, and 13 15of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act and Section 3-7 of the 16Uniform Penalty and Interest Act as if those provisions were 17set forth in this Section.18    Persons subject to any tax imposed under the authority 19granted in this Section may reimburse themselves for their 20sellers' tax liability by separately stating the tax as an 21additional charge, which charge may be stated in combination, 22in a single amount, with State tax which sellers are required 23to collect under the Use Tax Act, pursuant to such bracketed 24schedules as the Department may prescribe.25    Whenever the Department determines that a refund should be 26made under this Section to a claimant instead of issuing a   HB3847- 12 -LRB104 06344 RTM 16380 b1credit memorandum, the Department shall notify the State 2Comptroller, who shall cause the order to be drawn for the 3amount specified and to the person named in the notification 4from the Department. The refund shall be paid by the State 5Treasurer out of the County Public Safety, Public Facilities, 6Mental Health, Substance Abuse, or Transportation Retailers' 7Occupation Tax Fund or the Local Government Aviation Trust 8Fund, as appropriate. 9    (b) If a tax has been imposed under subsection (a), a 10service occupation tax shall also be imposed at the same rate 11upon all persons engaged, in the county, in the business of 12making sales of service, who, as an incident to making those 13sales of service, transfer tangible personal property within 14the county as an incident to a sale of service. This tax may 15not be imposed on tangible personal property taxed at the 1% 16rate under the Service Occupation Tax Act (or at the 0% rate 17imposed under this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 18Assembly). Beginning December 1, 2019 and through December 31, 192020, this tax is not imposed on sales of aviation fuel unless 20the tax revenue is expended for airport-related purposes. If 21the county does not have an airport-related purpose to which 22it dedicates aviation fuel tax revenue, then aviation fuel is 23excluded from the tax. The county must comply with the 24certification requirements for airport-related purposes under 25Section 2-22 of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. For 26purposes of this Section, "airport-related purposes" has the   HB3847- 13 -LRB104 06344 RTM 16380 b1meaning ascribed in Section 6z-20.2 of the State Finance Act. 2Beginning January 1, 2021, this tax is not imposed on sales of 3aviation fuel for so long as the revenue use requirements of 49 4U.S.C. 47107(b) and 49 U.S.C. 47133 are binding on the county. 5The tax imposed under this subsection and all civil penalties 6that may be assessed as an incident thereof shall be collected 7and enforced by the Department of Revenue. The Department has 8full power to administer and enforce this subsection; to 9collect all taxes and penalties due hereunder; to dispose of 10taxes and penalties so collected in the manner hereinafter 11provided; and to determine all rights to credit memoranda 12arising on account of the erroneous payment of tax or penalty 13hereunder. In the administration of and compliance with this 14subsection, the Department and persons who are subject to this 15paragraph shall (i) have the same rights, remedies, 16privileges, immunities, powers, and duties, (ii) be subject to 17the same conditions, restrictions, limitations, penalties, 18exclusions, exemptions, and definitions of terms, and (iii) 19employ the same modes of procedure as are prescribed in 20Sections 2 (except that the reference to State in the 21definition of supplier maintaining a place of business in this 22State shall mean the county), 2a, 2b, 2c, 3 through 3-50 (in 23respect to all provisions therein other than the State rate of 24tax), 4 (except that the reference to the State shall be to the 25county), 5, 7, 8 (except that the jurisdiction to which the tax 26shall be a debt to the extent indicated in that Section 8 shall   HB3847- 14 -LRB104 06344 RTM 16380 b1be the county), 9 (except as to the disposition of taxes and 2penalties collected, and except that the retailer's discount 3is not allowed for taxes paid on aviation fuel that are 4deposited into the Local Government Aviation Trust Fund), 10, 511, 12 (except the reference therein to Section 2b of the 6Retailers' Occupation Tax Act), 13 (except that any reference 7to the State shall mean the county), Section 15, 16, 17, 18, 819, and 20 of the Service Occupation Tax Act, and Section 3-7 9of the Uniform Penalty and Interest Act, as fully as if those 10provisions were set forth herein.11    Persons subject to any tax imposed under the authority 12granted in this subsection may reimburse themselves for their 13serviceman's tax liability by separately stating the tax as an 14additional charge, which charge may be stated in combination, 15in a single amount, with State tax that servicemen are 16authorized to collect under the Service Use Tax Act, in 17accordance with such bracket schedules as the Department may 18prescribe.19    Whenever the Department determines that a refund should be 20made under this subsection to a claimant instead of issuing a 21credit memorandum, the Department shall notify the State 22Comptroller, who shall cause the warrant to be drawn for the 23amount specified, and to the person named, in the notification 24from the Department. The refund shall be paid by the State 25Treasurer out of the County Public Safety, Public Facilities, 26Mental Health, Substance Abuse, or Transportation Retailers'   HB3847- 15 -LRB104 06344 RTM 16380 b1Occupation Fund or the Local Government Aviation Trust Fund, 2as appropriate.3    Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to authorize 4the county to impose a tax upon the privilege of engaging in 5any business which under the Constitution of the United States 6may not be made the subject of taxation by the State.7    (b-5) If, on January 1, 2025, a unit of local government 8has in effect a tax under this Section, or if, after January 1, 92025, a unit of local government imposes a tax under this 10Section, then that tax applies to leases of tangible personal 11property in effect, entered into, or renewed on or after that 12date in the same manner as the tax under this Section and in 13accordance with the changes made by this amendatory Act of the 14103rd General Assembly. 15    (c) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the 16Department shall immediately pay over to the State Treasurer, 17ex officio, as trustee, all taxes and penalties collected 18under this Section to be deposited into the County Public 19Safety, Public Facilities, Mental Health, Substance Abuse, or 20Transportation Retailers' Occupation Tax Fund, which shall be 21an unappropriated trust fund held outside of the State 22treasury. Taxes and penalties collected on aviation fuel sold 23on or after December 1, 2019 and through December 31, 2020, 24shall be immediately paid over by the Department to the State 25Treasurer, ex officio, as trustee, for deposit into the Local 26Government Aviation Trust Fund. The Department shall only pay   HB3847- 16 -LRB104 06344 RTM 16380 b1moneys into the Local Government Aviation Trust Fund under 2this Act for so long as the revenue use requirements of 49 3U.S.C. 47107(b) and 49 U.S.C. 47133 are binding on the county. 4    As soon as possible after the first day of each month, 5beginning January 1, 2011, upon certification of the 6Department of Revenue, the Comptroller shall order 7transferred, and the Treasurer shall transfer, to the STAR 8Bonds Revenue Fund the local sales tax increment, as defined 9in the Innovation Development and Economy Act, collected under 10this Section during the second preceding calendar month for 11sales within a STAR bond district. 12    After the monthly transfer to the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund, 13on or before the 25th day of each calendar month, the 14Department shall prepare and certify to the Comptroller the 15disbursement of stated sums of money to the counties from 16which retailers have paid taxes or penalties to the Department 17during the second preceding calendar month. The amount to be 18paid to each county, and deposited by the county into its 19special fund created for the purposes of this Section, shall 20be the amount (not including credit memoranda and not 21including taxes and penalties collected on aviation fuel sold 22on or after December 1, 2019 and through December 31, 2020) 23collected under this Section during the second preceding 24calendar month by the Department plus an amount the Department 25determines is necessary to offset any amounts that were 26erroneously paid to a different taxing body, and not including   HB3847- 17 -LRB104 06344 RTM 16380 b1(i) an amount equal to the amount of refunds made during the 2second preceding calendar month by the Department on behalf of 3the county, (ii) any amount that the Department determines is 4necessary to offset any amounts that were payable to a 5different taxing body but were erroneously paid to the county, 6(iii) any amounts that are transferred to the STAR Bonds 7Revenue Fund, and (iv) 1.5% of the remainder, which shall be 8transferred into the Tax Compliance and Administration Fund. 9The Department, at the time of each monthly disbursement to 10the counties, shall prepare and certify to the State 11Comptroller the amount to be transferred into the Tax 12Compliance and Administration Fund under this subsection. 13Within 10 days after receipt by the Comptroller of the 14disbursement certification to the counties and the Tax 15Compliance and Administration Fund provided for in this 16Section to be given to the Comptroller by the Department, the 17Comptroller shall cause the orders to be drawn for the 18respective amounts in accordance with directions contained in 19the certification.20    In addition to the disbursement required by the preceding 21paragraph, an allocation shall be made in March of each year to 22each county that received more than $500,000 in disbursements 23under the preceding paragraph in the preceding calendar year. 24The allocation shall be in an amount equal to the average 25monthly distribution made to each such county under the 26preceding paragraph during the preceding calendar year   HB3847- 18 -LRB104 06344 RTM 16380 b1(excluding the 2 months of highest receipts). The distribution 2made in March of each year subsequent to the year in which an 3allocation was made pursuant to this paragraph and the 4preceding paragraph shall be reduced by the amount allocated 5and disbursed under this paragraph in the preceding calendar 6year. The Department shall prepare and certify to the 7Comptroller for disbursement the allocations made in 8accordance with this paragraph.9    (d) For the purpose of determining the local governmental 10unit whose tax is applicable, a retail sale by a producer of 11coal or another mineral mined in Illinois is a sale at retail 12at the place where the coal or other mineral mined in Illinois 13is extracted from the earth. This paragraph does not apply to 14coal or another mineral when it is delivered or shipped by the 15seller to the purchaser at a point outside Illinois so that the 16sale is exempt under the United States Constitution as a sale 17in interstate or foreign commerce.18    (e) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 19authorize a county to impose a tax upon the privilege of 20engaging in any business that under the Constitution of the 21United States may not be made the subject of taxation by this 22State.23    (e-5) If a county imposes a tax under this Section, the 24county board may, by ordinance, discontinue or lower the rate 25of the tax. If the county board lowers the tax rate or 26discontinues the tax, a referendum must be held in accordance   HB3847- 19 -LRB104 06344 RTM 16380 b1with subsection (a) of this Section in order to increase the 2rate of the tax or to reimpose the discontinued tax.3    (f) Beginning April 1, 1998 and through December 31, 2013, 4the results of any election authorizing a proposition to 5impose a tax under this Section or effecting a change in the 6rate of tax, or any ordinance lowering the rate or 7discontinuing the tax, shall be certified by the county clerk 8and filed with the Illinois Department of Revenue either (i) 9on or before the first day of April, whereupon the Department 10shall proceed to administer and enforce the tax as of the first 11day of July next following the filing; or (ii) on or before the 12first day of October, whereupon the Department shall proceed 13to administer and enforce the tax as of the first day of 14January next following the filing.15    Beginning January 1, 2014, the results of any election 16authorizing a proposition to impose a tax under this Section 17or effecting an increase in the rate of tax, along with the 18ordinance adopted to impose the tax or increase the rate of the 19tax, or any ordinance adopted to lower the rate or discontinue 20the tax, shall be certified by the county clerk and filed with 21the Illinois Department of Revenue either (i) on or before the 22first day of May, whereupon the Department shall proceed to 23administer and enforce the tax as of the first day of July next 24following the adoption and filing; or (ii) on or before the 25first day of October, whereupon the Department shall proceed 26to administer and enforce the tax as of the first day of   HB3847- 20 -LRB104 06344 RTM 16380 b1January next following the adoption and filing. 2    (g) When certifying the amount of a monthly disbursement 3to a county under this Section, the Department shall increase 4or decrease the amounts by an amount necessary to offset any 5miscalculation of previous disbursements. The offset amount 6shall be the amount erroneously disbursed within the previous 76 months from the time a miscalculation is discovered.8    (g-5) Every county authorized to levy a tax under this 9Section shall, before it levies such tax, establish a 7-member 10mental health board, which shall have the same powers and 11duties and be constituted in the same manner as a community 12mental health board established under the Community Mental 13Health Act. Proceeds of the tax under this Section that are 14earmarked for mental health or substance abuse purposes shall 15be deposited into a special county occupation tax fund for 16mental health and substance abuse. The 7-member mental health 17board established under this subsection shall administer the 18special county occupation tax fund for mental health and 19substance abuse in the same manner as the community mental 20health board administers the community mental health fund 21under the Community Mental Health Act, including the 22utilization of funds for intellectual and developmental 23disability services. A community mental health board that 24moved from a property tax to a special county occupation tax 25under this Section, and is receiving less revenue under the 26special county occupation tax, shall automatically have the   HB3847- 21 -LRB104 06344 RTM 16380 b1special county occupation tax increased to the next quarter 2increment to maintain current operations without disruption to 3services. 4    (h) This Section may be cited as the "Special County 5Occupation Tax For Public Safety, Public Facilities, Mental 6Health, Substance Abuse, or Transportation Law".7    (i) For purposes of this Section, "public safety" 8includes, but is not limited to, crime prevention, detention, 9fire fighting, police, medical, ambulance, or other emergency 10services. The county may share tax proceeds received under 11this Section for public safety purposes, including proceeds 12received before August 4, 2009 (the effective date of Public 13Act 96-124), with any fire protection district located in the 14county. For the purposes of this Section, "transportation" 15includes, but is not limited to, the construction, 16maintenance, operation, and improvement of public highways, 17any other purpose for which a county may expend funds under the 18Illinois Highway Code, and passenger rail transportation. For 19the purposes of this Section, "public facilities purposes" 20includes, but is not limited to, the acquisition, development, 21construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement, 22financing, architectural planning, and installation of capital 23facilities consisting of buildings, structures, and durable 24equipment and for the acquisition and improvement of real 25property and interest in real property required, or expected 26to be required, in connection with the public facilities, for   HB3847- 22 -LRB104 06344 RTM 16380 b1use by the county for the furnishing of governmental services 2to its citizens, including, but not limited to, museums and 3nursing homes.4    (j) The Department may promulgate rules to implement 5Public Act 95-1002 only to the extent necessary to apply the 6existing rules for the Special County Retailers' Occupation 7Tax for Public Safety to this new purpose for public 8facilities. 9(Source: P.A. 102-379, eff. 1-1-22; 102-700, eff. 4-19-22; 10103-592, eff. 1-1-25.)